Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2002
State patrol; superintendent; how designated; subordinate officers; employees; appointment; salaries; expense allowance; bond or insurance; premium, how paid.

The superintendent, also designated as colonel, shall, with the approval of the Governor, appoint such subordinate officers of the Nebraska State Patrol as lieutenant colonel, majors, captains, lieutenants, sergeants, corporals, patrol officers, and such other employees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. The salaries of all such appointees shall be fixed by the superintendent, with the approval of the Governor. In addition to his or her salary, each sworn employee of the Nebraska State Patrol shall receive an expense allowance of one hundred dollars per month. All such appointees shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. Premiums shall be paid from the fund appropriated to the Nebraska State Patrol.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 3, p. 507;

Laws 1941, c. 176, § 5, p. 691;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-418;

R.S.1943, § 60-432;

Laws 1959, c. 286, § 4, p. 1085;

Laws 1965, c. 386, § 1, p. 1240;

Laws 1969, c. 510, § 1, p. 2089;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-432;

Laws 1981, LB 541, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 44.

"This act", formerly defined in section 60-401 as meaning sections 60-401 to 60-430.06. For the last printed version of section 60-401 see the 1988 Reissue of Volume 3B.